test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NI_A_mashkimod_gt-glossing.yaml
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gmashkmodenymishnaanba
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmashkmodenymishnaandig
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: gmashkmodenymishwaaba
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmashkmodenymishwaadig
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gmashkmodensmishnaanba
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmashkmodensmishnaandig
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: gmashkmodensmishwaaba
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmashkmodensmishwaadig
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: mashkmodenymishwaaba
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: mashkmodenymishwaadig
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt: mashkmodenymishniwba
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl: mashkmodenymishniwdig
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: mashkmodensmishwaaba
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: mashkmodensmishwaadig
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt: mashkmodensmishniwba
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl: mashkmodensmishniwdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 7
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: nmashkmodenymishnaanin
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: nmashkmodenymishnaaning
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: nmashkmodenymishnaanin
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: nmashkmodensmishnaanin
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: nmashkmodensmishnaaning
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: nmashkmodensmishnaanin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: gmashkmodenymishnaanin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gmashkmodenymishnaaning
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gmashkmodenymishnaanin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: gmashkmodenymishwaan
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gmashkmodenymishwaang
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: gmashkmodenymishwaan
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: gmashkmodensmishnaanin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gmashkmodensmishnaaning
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gmashkmodensmishnaanin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: gmashkmodensmishwaan
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gmashkmodensmishwaang
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: gmashkmodensmishwaan
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: mashkmodenymishwaan
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: mashkmodenymishwaang
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: mashkmodenymishwaan
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+4: mashkmodenymishniwan
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Loc: mashkmodenymishniing
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Pl: mashkmodenymishniwan
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: mashkmodensmishwaan
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: mashkmodensmishwaang
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: mashkmodensmishwaan
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+4: mashkmodensmishniwan
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Loc: mashkmodensmishniing
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Pl: mashkmodensmishniwan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 6, 7
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: nmashkmodenymishbaniin
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: nmashkmodenymishbaniing
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: nmashkmodenymishbaniin
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: nmashkmodensmishbaniin
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: nmashkmodensmishbaniing
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: nmashkmodensmishbaniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: gmashkmodenymishbaniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: gmashkmodenymishbaniing
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: gmashkmodenymishbaniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: gmashkmodensmishbaniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: gmashkmodensmishbaniing
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: gmashkmodensmishbaniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: mashkmodenymishbaniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: mashkmodenymishbaniing
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: mashkmodenymishbaniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: mashkmodensmishbaniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: mashkmodensmishbaniing
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: mashkmodensmishbaniin
     X+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: mashkmodenymishbaniin
     X+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: mashkmodenymishbaniing
     X+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: mashkmodenymishbaniin
     X+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: mashkmodensmishbaniin
     X+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: mashkmodensmishbaniing
     X+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: mashkmodensmishbaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5, 6, 7
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: nmashkmodenyminaanbaniin
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nmashkmodenyminaanbaniing
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nmashkmodenyminaanbaniin
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: nmashkmodensminaanbaniin
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nmashkmodensminaanbaniing
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nmashkmodensminaanbaniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: gmashkmodenyminaanbaniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmashkmodenyminaanbaniing
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmashkmodenyminaanbaniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: gmashkmodenymiwaabniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmashkmodenymiwaabniing
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmashkmodenymiwaabniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: gmashkmodensminaanbaniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmashkmodensminaanbaniing
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmashkmodensminaanbaniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: gmashkmodensmiwaabniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmashkmodensmiwaabniing
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmashkmodensmiwaabniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: mashkmodenymiwaabniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: mashkmodenymiwaabniing
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: mashkmodenymiwaabniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+4: mashkmodenyminwibniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+Loc: mashkmodenyminwibniing
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+Pl: mashkmodenyminwibniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: mashkmodensmiwaabniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: mashkmodensmiwaabniing
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: mashkmodensmiwaabniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+4: mashkmodensminwibniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+Loc: mashkmodensminwibniing
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+Pl: mashkmodensminwibniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nmashkmodenyshinaanbaniin
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nmashkmodenyshinaanbaniing
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nmashkmodenyshinaanbaniin
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nmashkmodensshinaanbaniin
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nmashkmodensshinaanbaniing
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nmashkmodensshinaanbaniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gmashkmodenyshinaanbaniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmashkmodenyshinaanbaniing
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmashkmodenyshinaanbaniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gmashkmodenyshiwaabniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmashkmodenyshiwaabniing
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmashkmodenyshiwaabniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gmashkmodensshinaanbaniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmashkmodensshinaanbaniing
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmashkmodensshinaanbaniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gmashkmodensshiwaabniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmashkmodensshiwaabniing
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmashkmodensshiwaabniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: mashkmodenyshiwaabniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: mashkmodenyshiwaabniing
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: mashkmodenyshiwaabniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: mashkmodenyshinwibniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: mashkmodenyshinwibniing
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+3+4+Prt+Pl: mashkmodenyshinwibniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: mashkmodensshiwaabniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: mashkmodensshiwaabniing
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: mashkmodensshiwaabniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: mashkmodensshinwibniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: mashkmodensshinwibniing
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+Prt+Pl: mashkmodensshinwibniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nmashkmodaamshinaanbaniin
     1+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nmashkmodaamshinaanbaniing
     1+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nmashkmodaamshinaanbaniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gmashkmodaamshinaanbaniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmashkmodaamshinaanbaniing
     2+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmashkmodaamshinaanbaniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gmashkmodaamshiwaabniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmashkmodaamshiwaabniing
     2+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmashkmodaamshiwaabniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: mashkmodaamshiwaabniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: mashkmodaamshiwaabniing
     3+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: mashkmodaamshiwaabniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: mashkmodaamshinwibniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: mashkmodaamshinwibniing
     3+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Pl: mashkmodaamshinwibniin
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nmashkmodenymishnaanbaniin
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nmashkmodenymishnaanbaniing
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nmashkmodenymishnaanbaniin
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nmashkmodensmishnaanbaniin
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nmashkmodensmishnaanbaniing
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nmashkmodensmishnaanbaniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gmashkmodenymishnaanbaniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmashkmodenymishnaanbaniing
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmashkmodenymishnaanbaniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gmashkmodenymishwaabniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmashkmodenymishwaabniing
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmashkmodenymishwaabniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gmashkmodensmishnaanbaniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmashkmodensmishnaanbaniing
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmashkmodensmishnaanbaniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gmashkmodensmishwaabniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmashkmodensmishwaabniing
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmashkmodensmishwaabniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: mashkmodenymishwaabniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: mashkmodenymishwaabniing
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: mashkmodenymishwaabniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: mashkmodenymishniwbaniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: mashkmodenymishniwbaniing
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Pl: mashkmodenymishniwbaniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: mashkmodensmishwaabniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: mashkmodensmishwaabniing
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: mashkmodensmishwaabniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: mashkmodensmishniwbaniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: mashkmodensmishniwbaniing
